Utah statutes.
57-8-48.   One-action rule not applicable -- Abandonment of enforcement proceedings.

(1)  Subsection 78B-6-901(1) does not apply to an association of unit owners' judicial or nonjudicial foreclosure of a unit under this part.

(2)  An association of unit owners may abandon a judicial foreclosure, nonjudicial foreclosure, or sheriff's sale and initiate a separate action or another judicial foreclosure, nonjudicial foreclosure, or sheriff's sale if the initial judicial foreclosure, nonjudicial foreclosure, or sheriff's sale is not complete.

